Illinois, session 104th, SB4024.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Funeral Directors and Embalmers Licensing 5Code is amended by changing Sections 1-10, 1-15, 1-20, 15-30, 615-45, 15-72, and 15-75 and by adding Article 11 and Sections 71-21, 1-22, and 1-23 as follows: 8    (225 ILCS 41/1-10)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)10    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. As used in this Code:11    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 12by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 13file or license file. 14    "Applicant" means any person making application for a 15license. Any applicants or people who hold themselves out as 16applicants are considered licensees for purposes of 17enforcement, investigation, hearings, and the Illinois 18Administrative Procedure Act.19    "Board" means the Funeral Directors and Embalmers 20Licensing and Disciplinary Board.21    "Certificate of Death" means a certificate of death as 22referenced in the Illinois Vital Records Act. 23    "Chain of custody record" means a record that establishes   SB4024- 2 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1the continuous control of a uniquely identified body, body 2parts, or human remains. 3    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 4Professional Regulation.5    "Email address of record" means the designated email 6address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 7application file or the licensee's license file as maintained 8by the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 9    "Funeral director and embalmer" means a person who is 10licensed and qualified to practice funeral directing and to 11prepare, disinfect and preserve dead human bodies by the 12injection or external application of antiseptics, 13disinfectants or preservative fluids and materials and to use 14derma surgery or plastic art for the restoring of mutilated 15features. It further means a person who restores the remains 16of a person for the purpose of funeralization whose organs or 17bone or tissue has been donated for anatomical purposes.18    "Funeral director and embalmer intern" means a person 19licensed by the Department who is qualified to render 20assistance to a funeral director and embalmer in carrying out 21the practice of funeral directing and embalming under the 22supervision of the funeral director and embalmer.23    "Embalming" means the process of sanitizing and chemically 24treating a deceased human body in order to reduce the presence 25and growth of microorganisms, to retard organic decomposition, 26to render the remains safe to handle while retaining   SB4024- 3 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1naturalness of tissue, and to restore an acceptable physical 2appearance for funeral viewing purposes.3    "Funeral director" means a person, known by the title of 4"funeral director" or other similar words or titles, licensed 5by the Department who practices funeral directing.6    "Funeral establishment", "funeral chapel", "funeral home", 7or "mortuary", except when used in reference to transfer care 8specialists, means a building or separate portion of a 9building having a specific street address or location and 10devoted to activities relating to the shelter, care, custody 11and preparation of a deceased human body and which may contain 12facilities for funeral or wake services. "Funeral 13establishment", "funeral chapel", "funeral home", or 14"mortuary", when used in reference to transfer care 15specialists, means a building or a separate portion of a 16building having a specific street address or location devoted 17to activities relating to the shelter, care, custody and 18preparation of a deceased human body that contains facilities 19for funeral and wake services and operates from a fixed place 20of business. 21    "General supervision" means oversight of an activity 22provided by a licensed funeral director or licensed funeral 23director and embalmer who has authorized the activity to be 24performed, is responsible for the conduct and outcome of the 25activity, and is available for consultation and direction on 26the activity as needed, but who is not required to be   SB4024- 4 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1physically present at the location where the activity is 2performed.3    "Immediate and direct supervision" means oversight of an 4activity provided by a licensed funeral director or licensed 5funeral director and embalmer who is physically present to 6observe the activity and, as necessary, correct the 7performance of a licensed funeral director and embalmer intern 8or a licensed transfer care specialist. "Immediate and direct 9supervision" does not include supervision provided by 10telephone, electronic communication, or periodic review after 11the activity has occurred. 12    "Licensee" means a person licensed under this Code as a 13funeral director, funeral director and embalmer, or funeral 14director and embalmer intern, or transfer care specialist. 15Anyone who holds himself or herself out as a licensee or who is 16accused of unlicensed practice is considered a licensee for 17purposes of enforcement, investigation, hearings, and the 18Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 19    "Owner" means the individual, partnership, corporation, 20limited liability company, association, trust, estate, or 21agent thereof, or other person or combination of persons who 22owns a funeral establishment or funeral business.23    "Person" means any individual, partnership, association, 24firm, corporation, limited liability company, trust or estate, 25or other entity. "Person" includes both natural persons and 26legal entities.   SB4024- 5 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 2Professional Regulation.3    "Transfer care specialist" means a person who is licensed 4and qualified to perform the removal of a deceased human body 5from its place of death, institution, or other location under 6the supervision of a licensed funeral director or a licensed 7funeral director and embalmer.8    "Uniquely identified" means providing the deceased with 9individualized identification. 10(Source: P.A. 102-881, eff. 1-1-23; 103-907, eff. 1-1-25.) 11    (225 ILCS 41/1-15)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)13    Sec. 1-15. Funeral directing; definition. Conducting or 14engaging in or representing or holding out oneself as 15conducting or engaging in any one or any combination of the 16following practices constitutes the practice of funeral 17directing:18        (a) The practice of preparing, otherwise than by 19    embalming, for the burial, cremation, or disposition and 20    directing and supervising the burial or disposition of 21    deceased human remains or performing any act or service in 22    connection with the preparing of dead human bodies. 23    Preparation, direction, and supervision shall not be 24    construed to mean those functions normally performed by 25    cemetery and crematory personnel, except for functions   SB4024- 6 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    that include direct physical contact with deceased human 2    remains or the direction or supervision of the disposition 3    of deceased human remains beyond the act of burial or 4    cremation.5        (b) The practice of operating a place for preparing 6    for the disposition of deceased human bodies or for caring 7    for deceased human bodies before their disposition. 8    Nothing in this Code shall prohibit the ownership and 9    management of such a place by an unlicensed owner if the 10    place is operated in accordance with this Code and the 11    unlicensed owner does not engage in any form of funeral 12    directing. An unlicensed owner may interact with consumers 13    while a licensed funeral director is present in accordance 14    with this Section.15        (c) The removal of a deceased human body from its 16    place of death, institution, or other location. A licensed 17    funeral director and embalmer intern or a licensed 18    transfer care specialist may remove a deceased human body 19    from its place of death, institution, or other location 20    without a licensed funeral director another licensee being 21    present. The licensed funeral director may engage others 22    who are not licensed funeral directors, licensed funeral 23    director and embalmers, or licensed funeral director and 24    embalmer interns, or licensed transfer care specialists to 25    assist in the removal if the funeral director directs and 26    instructs them in handling and precautionary procedures   SB4024- 7 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    and accompanies them on all calls. The transportation of 2    deceased human remains to a cemetery, crematory or other 3    place of final disposition shall be under the immediate 4    direct supervision of a licensed funeral director licensee 5    unless otherwise permitted by this Section. The 6    transportation of deceased human remains that are embalmed 7    or otherwise prepared and enclosed in an appropriate 8    container to some other place that is not the place of 9    final disposition, such as another funeral home or common 10    carrier, or to a facility that shares common ownership 11    with the transporting funeral home may be performed under 12    the general supervision of a licensed funeral director 13    licensee, but the supervision need not be immediate and or 14    direct. 15        (d) The administering and conducting of, or assuming 16    responsibility for administering and conducting of, at 17    need funeral arrangements.18        (e) The assuming custody of, transportation, providing 19    shelter, protection and care and disposition of deceased 20    human remains and the furnishing of necessary funeral 21    services, facilities and equipment.22        (f) Using in connection with a name or practice the 23    word "funeral director", "undertaker", "mortician", 24    "funeral home", "funeral parlor", "funeral chapel", or any 25    other title implying that the person is engaged in the 26    practice of funeral directing.  SB4024- 8 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    Within the existing scope of the practice of funeral 2directing or funeral directing and embalming, only a licensed 3funeral director, a licensed funeral director and embalmer, or 4a licensed funeral director and embalmer intern under the 5restrictions provided for in this Code, and not any other 6person employed or contracted by the licensee, may engage in 7the following activities at-need: (1) have direct contact with 8consumers and explain funeral or burial merchandise or 9services or (2) negotiate, develop, or finalize contracts with 10consumers. This paragraph shall not be construed or enforced 11in such a manner as to limit the functions of persons regulated 12under the Illinois Funeral or Burial Funds Act, the Illinois 13Pre-Need Cemetery Sales Act, the Cemetery Oversight Act, the 14Cemetery Care Act, the Cemetery Association Act, the Illinois 15Insurance Code, or any other related professional regulatory 16Act.17    The practice of funeral directing shall not include the 18phoning in of obituary notices, ordering of flowers for the 19funeral, or reporting of prices on the firm's general price 20list as required by the Federal Trade Commission Funeral Rule 21by nonlicensed persons, or like clerical tasks incidental to 22the act of making funeral arrangements.23    The making of funeral arrangements, at need, shall be done 24only by licensed funeral directors or licensed funeral 25directors and embalmers. Licensed funeral director and 26embalmer interns may, however, assist or participate in the   SB4024- 9 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1arrangements under the direct supervision of a licensed 2funeral director or licensed funeral director and embalmer. 3(Source: P.A. 102-881, eff. 1-1-23.) 4    (225 ILCS 41/1-20)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)6    Sec. 1-20. Funeral directing and embalming; definition. 7"The practice of funeral directing and embalming" means:8        (a) The practice of preparing, otherwise than by 9    embalming, for the burial, cremation, or disposition and 10    directing and supervising the burial or disposition of 11    deceased human remains or performing any act or service in 12    connection with the preparing of dead human bodies. 13    Preparation, direction, and supervision shall not be 14    construed to mean those functions normally performed by 15    cemetery and crematory personnel, except for functions 16    that include direct physical contact with deceased human 17    remains or the direction or supervision of the disposition 18    of deceased human remains beyond the act of burial or 19    cremation.20        (b) The practice of operating a place for preparing 21    for the disposition of deceased human bodies or for caring 22    for deceased human bodies before their disposition. 23    Nothing in this Code shall prohibit the ownership and 24    management of such a place by an unlicensed owner if the 25    place is operated in accordance with this Code and the   SB4024- 10 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    unlicensed owner does not engage in any form of funeral 2    directing and embalming.3        (c) The removal of a deceased human body from its 4    place of death, institution or other location. A licensed 5    funeral director and embalmer intern or a licensed 6    transfer care specialist may remove a deceased human body 7    from its place of death, institution, or other location 8    without a licensed funeral director and embalmer another 9    licensee being present. The licensed funeral director and 10    embalmer may engage others who are not licensed funeral 11    directors and embalmers, licensed funeral directors, or 12    licensed funeral director and embalmer interns, or 13    licensed transfer care specialists to assist in the 14    removal if the funeral director and embalmer directs and 15    instructs them in handling and precautionary procedures 16    and accompanies them on all calls. The transportation of 17    deceased human remains to a cemetery, crematory, or other 18    place of final disposition shall be under the immediate, 19    direct supervision of a licensed funeral director and 20    embalmer licensee unless otherwise permitted by this 21    Section. The transportation of deceased human remains that 22    are embalmed or otherwise prepared and enclosed in an 23    appropriate container to some other place that is not the 24    place of final disposition, such as another funeral home 25    or common carrier, or to a facility that shares common 26    ownership with the transporting funeral home may be   SB4024- 11 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    performed under the general supervision of a licensed 2    funeral director and embalmer licensee, but the 3    supervision need not be immediate and or direct 4    supervision. 5        (d) The administering and conducting of, or assuming 6    responsibility for administering and conducting of, at 7    need funeral arrangements.8        (e) The assuming custody of, transportation, providing 9    shelter, protection and care and disposition of deceased 10    human remains and the furnishing of necessary funeral 11    services, facilities and equipment.12        (f) Using in connection with a name or practice the 13    word "funeral director and embalmer", "embalmer", "funeral 14    director", "undertaker", "mortician", "funeral home", 15    "funeral parlor", "funeral chapel", or any other title 16    implying that the person is engaged in the practice of 17    funeral directing and embalming.18        (g) The practice of embalming or representing or 19    holding out oneself as engaged in the practice of 20    embalming of deceased human bodies or the transportation 21    of human bodies deceased of a contagious or infectious 22    disease. 23    Within the existing scope of the practice of funeral 24directing or funeral directing and embalming, only a licensed 25funeral director, a licensed funeral director and embalmer, or 26a licensed funeral director and embalmer intern under the   SB4024- 12 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1restrictions provided for in this Code, and not any other 2person employed or contracted by the licensee, may engage in 3the following activities at-need: (1) have direct contact with 4consumers and explain funeral or burial merchandise or 5services or (2) negotiate, develop, or finalize contracts with 6consumers. This paragraph shall not be construed or enforced 7in such a manner as to limit the functions of persons regulated 8under the Illinois Funeral or Burial Funds Act, the Illinois 9Pre-Need Cemetery Sales Act, the Cemetery Oversight Act, the 10Cemetery Care Act, the Cemetery Association Act, the Illinois 11Insurance Code, or any other related professional regulatory 12Act.13    The practice of funeral directing and embalming shall not 14include the phoning in of obituary notices, ordering of 15flowers for the funeral, or reporting of prices on the firm's 16general price list as required by the Federal Trade Commission 17Funeral Rule by nonlicensed persons, or like clerical tasks 18incidental to the act of making funeral arrangements.19    The making of funeral arrangements, at need, shall be done 20only by licensed funeral directors or licensed funeral 21directors and embalmers. Licensed funeral director and 22embalmer interns may, however, assist or participate in the 23arrangements under the direct supervision of a licensed 24funeral director or licensed funeral director and embalmer.25(Source: P.A. 96-1463, eff. 1-1-11; 97-1130, eff. 8-28-12.)   SB4024- 13 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    (225 ILCS 41/1-21 new)2    Sec. 1-21. Funeral establishment, funeral chapel, funeral 3home, or mortuary. A funeral establishment, funeral chapel, 4funeral home, or mortuary shall operate from a fixed place of 5business. A funeral establishment, funeral chapel, funeral 6home, or mortuary that is under different ownership from or 7that does not share a common financial or business interest 8with another funeral establishment, funeral chapel, funeral 9home, or mortuary shall not operate from the same address, 10location, or fixed place of business as that funeral 11establishment, funeral chapel, funeral home, or mortuary.  12    (225 ILCS 41/1-22 new)13    Sec. 1-22. General supervision. General supervision may be 14provided through periodic review, written protocols, or 15electronic or telephonic communication. A supervising licensed 16funeral director or licensed funeral director and embalmer 17shall be accountable for the actions of the licensed funeral 18director and embalmer intern or the licensed transfer care 19specialist being supervised throughout the duration of the 20training and supervision. The supervising licensed funeral 21director or licensed funeral director and embalmer shall also 22be accountable for any violations of law or rule committed in 23the performance of duties by the licensed funeral director and 24embalmer intern or licensed transfer care specialist being 25supervised.   SB4024- 14 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    (225 ILCS 41/1-23 new)2    Sec. 1-23. Immediate and direct supervision. A supervising 3licensed funeral director or licensed funeral director and 4embalmer shall be accountable for the actions of the licensed 5funeral director and embalmer intern or the licensed transfer 6care specialist being supervised throughout the duration of 7the training and supervision. The supervising licensed funeral 8director or licensed funeral director and embalmer shall also 9be accountable for any violations of law or rule committed in 10the performance of duties by the licensed funeral director and 11embalmer intern or licensed transfer care specialist being 12supervised. 13    (225 ILCS 41/Art. 11 heading new)14ARTICLE 11. TRANSFER CARE SPECIALISTS 15    (225 ILCS 41/11-1 new)16    Sec. 11-1. Applicability. This Article does not apply to 17Cook County, DuPage County, Lake County, and McHenry County.  18    (225 ILCS 41/11-5 new)19    Sec. 11-5. License requirement. It is unlawful for any 20person to practice or attempt to practice as a transfer care 21specialist without being licensed by the Department.22    No licensed transfer care specialist shall engage in the   SB4024- 15 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1independent practice of removing a deceased human body from 2its place of death, institution, or other location. A licensed 3transfer care specialist may perform such removal only while 4acting under the general supervision of a licensed funeral 5director or a licensed funeral director and embalmer who is on 6record with the Department as the sponsor of the licensed 7transfer care specialist.8    No person shall practice as a licensed transfer care 9specialist unless he or she is employed by a funeral 10establishment, funeral chapel, funeral home, or mortuary. The 11supervising licensed funeral director or licensed funeral 12director and embalmer who is on record with the Department as 13the sponsor of the licensed transfer care specialist shall 14also be employed by the same funeral establishment, funeral 15chapel, funeral home, or mortuary as the licensed transfer 16care specialist.17    No licensed transfer care specialist shall perform the 18removal of a deceased human body from its place of death, 19institution, or other location on behalf of any funeral 20establishment other than the funeral establishment that is on 21record with the Department as the employer of both the 22licensed transfer care specialist and the supervising licensed 23funeral director or licensed funeral director and embalmer who 24is the sponsor of the licensed transfer care specialist.25    No licensed transfer care specialist shall transport a 26deceased human body from a place of death to any funeral   SB4024- 16 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1establishment or other location other than the funeral 2establishment that is on record with the Department as the 3employer of both the licensed transfer care specialist and the 4supervising licensed funeral director or licensed funeral 5director and embalmer who is the sponsor of the licensed 6transfer care specialist.7    No licensed transfer care specialist shall practice 8funeral directing and embalming. 9    (225 ILCS 41/11-10 new)10    Sec. 11-10. Address of record; email address of record. 11All applicants and licensees shall:12        (1) provide a valid address and email address to the 13    Department, which shall serve as the address of record and 14    email address of record, respectively, at the time of 15    application for licensure, renewal, or restoration of a 16    license; and17        (2) inform the Department of any changes of address 18    within 14 days after the change of address of record or 19    email address of record, either through the Department's 20    website or by contacting the Department's licensure 21    maintenance unit. 22    (225 ILCS 41/11-15 new)23    Sec. 11-15. License qualifications. 24    (a) A person who meets all of the following requirements   SB4024- 17 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1is qualified to receive a license as a transfer care 2specialist:3        (1) is at least 18 years of age.4        (2) has successfully completed a Department-approved 5    certification course prior to submitting an application 6    for licensure. The certification course shall be at least 7    8 hours in length, shall be conducted in person and on 8    site, and shall include instruction, at a minimum, in the 9    following subject areas:10            (A) all relevant State and federal laws and 11        regulations related to the removal of a deceased human 12        body from its place of death and the transportation of 13        a deceased human body;14            (B) ethical care, handling, and transportation 15        procedures for deceased human bodies;16            (C) scene safety, hazard recognition, and the use 17        of personal protective equipment;18            (D) Occupational Safety and Health Administration 19        (OSHA) infection control and bloodborne pathogen 20        safety training, including the use of universal 21        precautions and other reasonable measures to minimize 22        the risk of transmitting communicable diseases;23            (E) health and safety concerns for the public and 24        the individual performing the transfer of the deceased 25        human body;26            (F) basic human anatomy and postmortem   SB4024- 18 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1        physiological changes related to the handling of 2        deceased human bodies;3            (G) proper lifting techniques, body mechanics, and 4        the use of equipment for the safe and dignified 5        removal and transport of deceased human bodies;6            (H) removal procedures for residential and 7        institutional places of death;8            (I) transportation safety and vehicle operations 9        related to the transfer of deceased human bodies;10            (J) communication with family members, health care 11        personnel, law enforcement, and medical examiner or 12        coroner staff; and13            (K) documentation and recordkeeping requirements 14        related to the removal and transfer of a deceased 15        human body.16        (3) is employed by a funeral establishment that is 17    authorized to employ a licensed transfer care specialist. 18    The employment of licensed transfer care specialists at a 19    funeral establishment shall be limited to no more than 2 20    licensed transfer care specialists for any funeral 21    establishment under common ownership or common interest 22    that is located within a 30-mile geographic radius of 23    another funeral establishment under the same common 24    ownership or common interest.25        (4) has been accepted by a licensed funeral director 26    or licensed funeral director and embalmer who will be   SB4024- 19 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    responsible for supervising the practice of the licensed 2    transfer care specialist. The supervising licensed funeral 3    director or licensed funeral director and embalmer must be 4    authorized to supervise a licensed transfer care 5    specialist and must be on record with the Department as 6    the sponsor of the licensed transfer care specialist. A 7    licensed funeral director or licensed funeral director and 8    embalmer shall sponsor or supervise no more than 2 9    licensed transfer care specialists at any time.10        (5) is satisfactorily versed in approved measures used 11    by the practice for the prevention and against the spread 12    of disease and has the skills reasonably involved, and is 13    adequately and properly protected against communicable 14    diseases by means usually adopted and approved by medical 15    science.16    (b) In addition to completing a certification course, an 17applicant shall complete no less than 12 removals of deceased 18human bodies that are performed under the immediate and direct 19supervision of a licensed funeral director or licensed funeral 20director and embalmer. The required supervised removals shall 21include, but are not limited to, at least 4 removals from a 22residential place of death and at least 4 removals from an 23institutional place of death.24    (c) An applicant for licensure shall submit proof of 25completion of a certification course and proof of the 26applicant's completion of supervised removals with the   SB4024- 20 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1applicant's license application on forms that have been 2prescribed by the Department or verified by a qualified 3organization that has been selected by the Department to 4maintain such records.5    (d) The Department may adopt rules to implement this 6Section, including rules concerning standards for course 7approval, supervision, documentation, minimum competencies, 8and record retention. 9    (225 ILCS 41/11-20 new)10    Sec. 11-20. Application. Every person who desires to 11obtain a license as a transfer care specialist shall apply to 12the Department in writing on forms or electronically as 13prescribed by the Department. An application shall contain 14proof of the particular qualifications that are required of 15the applicant, shall be certified by the applicant, the 16funeral establishment, and the licensed funeral director or 17licensed funeral director and embalmer sponsor, and shall be 18accompanied by the required fee that shall not be refundable. 19    (225 ILCS 41/11-25 new)20    Sec. 11-25. Issuance and display of transfer care 21specialist license. 22    (a) Whenever an applicant has met the requirements of this 23Code, the Department may issue a license to the applicant as a 24transfer care specialist.  SB4024- 21 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    (b) Every holder of a license as a transfer care 2specialist shall display the license, or a copy of the 3license, in a conspicuous place in the funeral establishment, 4funeral chapel, funeral home, or mortuary in which the 5licensee is employed. Every displayed license shall have the 6license number visible. 7    (225 ILCS 41/11-30 new)8    Sec. 11-30. Renewal; reinstatement; restoration. 9    (a) Transfer care specialist licenses shall expire on May 1031 of every odd-numbered year. The holder of a license as a 11transfer care specialist may renew the license during the 12month preceding the expiration date of the license by paying 13the required fee. Any licensed transfer care specialist whose 14license has been expired for more than 2 years may have the 15license restored only by fulfilling the requirements set forth 16by the Department by rule and by paying the required 17restoration fee. However, any transfer care specialist whose 18license has expired while he or she has been engaged (i) in 19federal service on active duty with the United States Army, 20Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Space Force, or Coast Guard, or 21the State Militia, called into the service or training of the 22United States of America, or (ii) in training or education 23under the supervision of the United States preliminary to 24induction into the military service, may have his or her 25license restored without paying any lapsed renewal fees or   SB4024- 22 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1restoration fee and without passing any examination if, within 22 years after termination of the service, training, or 3education other than by dishonorable discharge, he or she 4furnishes the Department with an affidavit to the effect that 5he or she has been so engaged and that his or her service, 6training, or education has been so terminated.7    (b) In addition to any other requirement for renewal of a 8license or the reinstatement or restoration of an expired 9license, as a condition for the renewal, reinstatement, or 10restoration of a license as a transfer care specialist, each 11licensee shall provide evidence to the Department of 12completion of at least 6 hours of continuing education during 13the 24 months preceding the expiration date of the license or, 14in the case of reinstatement or restoration, within the 24 15months preceding the application for reinstatement or 16restoration. Any continuing education sponsors shall be 17approved by the Board. In addition, any qualified continuing 18education course for licensed transfer care specialists 19offered by a college, university, the Illinois Funeral 20Directors Association, Funeral Directors Services Association 21of Greater Chicago, Cook County Association of Funeral Home 22Owners, Inc., Illinois Selected Morticians Associations, Inc., 23Illinois Cemetery and Funeral Home Association, National 24Funeral Directors Association, Selected Independent Funeral 25Homes, National Funeral Directors and Morticians Association, 26Inc., International Order of the Golden Rule, or an Illinois   SB4024- 23 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1school of mortuary science shall be accepted toward the 2satisfaction of the continuing education requirements under 3this Section.4    (c) The Department shall establish by rule a means for the 5verification of the completion of the continuing education 6required under this Section. The verification may be 7accomplished through audits of records maintained by 8licensees, by requiring the filing of continued education 9certificates with the Department or a qualified organization 10that has been selected by the Department to maintain the 11records, or by other means established by the Department.12    (d) Any transfer care specialist whose license is in 13nonrenewed status shall not engage in the practice of the 14removal of a deceased human body from its place of death, 15institution, or other location in this State or use the title 16or advertise that he or she performs the services of a licensed 17transfer care specialist. Any person who violates this Section 18shall be considered to be practicing without a license and 19shall be subject to the disciplinary provisions of this Code.20    (e) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2030. 21    (225 ILCS 41/11-40 new)22    Sec. 11-40. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 23to implement and administer this Article in accordance with 24the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.   SB4024- 24 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    (225 ILCS 41/15-30)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)3    Sec. 15-30. Unlicensed practice; violations; civil 4penalty. 5    (a) Any person who practices, offers to practice, attempts 6to practice, or holds one's self out as a funeral director or a 7funeral director and embalmer, or a funeral director and 8embalmer intern, or a transfer care specialist as provided in 9this Code without being licensed or exempt under this Code 10shall, in addition to any other penalty provided by law, pay a 11civil penalty to the Department in an amount not to exceed 12$10,000 for each offense, as determined by the Department. The 13civil penalty shall be assessed by the Department after a 14hearing is held in accordance with Section 15-75.15    (b) The Department may investigate any actual, alleged, or 16suspected unlicensed activity.17    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after 18the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty. 19The order shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and 20execution had thereon in the same manner as any judgment from 21any court of record.22    (d) A person or entity not licensed under this Code who has 23violated any provision of this Code or its rules is guilty of a 24Class A misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class 4 felony 25for a second and subsequent offenses. 26(Source: P.A. 102-881, eff. 1-1-23.)   SB4024- 25 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    (225 ILCS 41/15-45)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)3    Sec. 15-45. Practice without license; injunction; cease 4and desist order; civil penalties.5    (a) The practice of funeral directing and embalming or 6funeral directing by any person who has not been issued a 7license by the Department, whose license has been suspended or 8revoked, or whose license has not been renewed is hereby 9declared to be inimical to the public welfare and to 10constitute a public nuisance. The Secretary may, in the name 11of the People of the State of Illinois through the Attorney 12General of the State of Illinois, or the State's Attorney of 13any county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred 14in the State of Illinois, apply for an injunction in the 15circuit court to enjoin any person who has not been issued a 16license or whose license has been suspended or revoked, or 17whose license has not been renewed, from practicing funeral 18directing and embalming or funeral directing. Upon the filing 19of a verified complaint in court, the court, if satisfied by 20affidavit or otherwise that the person is or has been 21practicing funeral directing and embalming or funeral 22directing without having been issued a license or after his or 23her license has been suspended, revoked, or not renewed, may 24issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, 25without notice or bond, enjoining the defendant from further   SB4024- 26 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1practicing funeral directing and embalming or funeral 2directing. A copy of the verified complaint shall be served 3upon the defendant and the proceedings shall thereafter be 4conducted as in other civil cases. If it is established that 5the defendant has been or is practicing funeral directing and 6embalming or funeral directing without having been issued a 7license or has been or is practicing funeral directing and 8embalming or funeral directing after his or her license has 9been suspended, revoked, or not renewed, the court may enter a 10judgment perpetually enjoining the defendant from further 11practicing funeral directing and embalming or funeral 12directing. In case of violation of any injunction entered 13under this Section, the court may summarily try and punish the 14offender for contempt of court. Any injunction proceeding 15shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, all penalties and 16other remedies in this Code.17    (a-5) The practice of removing a deceased human body from 18its place of death, institution, or other location as a 19transfer care specialist by any person who has not been issued 20a license by the Department, whose license has been suspended 21or revoked, or whose license has not been renewed is hereby 22declared to be inimical to the public welfare and to 23constitute a public nuisance. The Secretary may, in the name 24of the People of the State of Illinois through the Attorney 25General or the State's Attorney of any county in this State in 26which the violation is alleged to have occurred, apply for an   SB4024- 27 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1injunction in the circuit court to enjoin any person who has 2not been issued a license, whose license has been suspended or 3revoked, or whose license has not been renewed, from 4practicing the removal of a deceased human body from its place 5of death, institution, or other location as a transfer care 6specialist. Upon the filing of a verified complaint in court, 7the court, if satisfied by affidavit or otherwise that the 8person is or has been practicing the removal of a deceased 9human body from its place of death, institution, or other 10location as a transfer care specialist without having been 11issued a license or after his or her license has been 12suspended, revoked, or not renewed, may issue a temporary 13restraining order or preliminary injunction, without notice or 14bond, enjoining the defendant from further practicing the 15removal of a deceased human body from its place of death, 16institution, or other location as a transfer care specialist. 17A copy of the verified complaint shall be served upon the 18defendant and the proceedings shall thereafter be conducted as 19proceedings in other civil cases. If it is established that 20the defendant has been or is practicing the removal of a 21deceased human body from its place of death, institution, or 22other location as a transfer care specialist without having 23been issued a license or has been or is practicing the removal 24of a deceased human body from its place of death, institution, 25or other location as a transfer care specialist after his or 26her license has been suspended, revoked, or not renewed, the   SB4024- 28 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1court may enter a judgment perpetually enjoining the defendant 2from further practicing the removal of a deceased human body 3from its place of death, institution, or other location as a 4transfer care specialist. In case of the violation of any 5injunction entered pursuant to this Section, the court may 6summarily try and punish the offender for contempt of court. 7Any injunction proceeding shall be in addition to, and not in 8lieu of, all penalties and other remedies in this Code. 9    (b) Whenever, in the opinion of the Department, any person 10or other entity violates any provision of this Code, the 11Department may issue a notice to show cause why an order to 12cease and desist should not be entered against that person or 13other entity. The rule shall clearly set forth the grounds 14relied upon by the Department and shall provide a period of 7 15days from the date of the rule to file an answer to the 16satisfaction of the Department. Failure to answer to the 17satisfaction of the Department shall cause an order to cease 18and desist to be issued immediately. 19    (c) (Blank).20(Source: P.A. 96-1463, eff. 1-1-11; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11; 2197-1130, eff. 8-28-12.) 22    (225 ILCS 41/15-72)23    Sec. 15-72. Applicant convictions. 24    (a) When reviewing a conviction by plea of guilty or nolo 25contendere, finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of   SB4024- 29 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1judgment or by sentencing of an initial applicant, the 2Department may only deny a license based upon consideration of 3mitigating factors provided in subsection (c) of this Section 4for a felony directly related to the practice of funeral 5directing and embalming.6    (b) The following crimes or similar offenses in any other 7jurisdiction are hereby deemed directly related to the 8practice of funeral directing and embalming and the practice 9of removing a deceased human body from its place of death, 10institution, or other location as a transfer care specialist:11        (1) first degree murder;12        (2) second degree murder;13        (3) drug induced homicide;14        (4) unlawful restraint;15        (5) aggravated unlawful restraint;16        (6) forcible detention;17        (7) involuntary servitude;18        (8) involuntary sexual servitude of a minor;19        (9) predatory criminal sexual assault of a child;20        (10) aggravated criminal sexual assault;21        (11) criminal sexual assault;22        (12) criminal sexual abuse;23        (13) aggravated kidnaping;24        (14) aggravated robbery;25        (15) armed robbery;26        (16) kidnapping;  SB4024- 30 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1        (17) aggravated battery;2        (18) aggravated vehicular hijacking;3        (19) terrorism;4        (20) causing a catastrophe;5        (21) possession of a deadly substance;6        (22) making a terrorist threat;7        (23) material support for terrorism;8        (24) hindering prosecution of terrorism;9        (25) armed violence;10        (26) any felony based on consumer fraud or deceptive 11    business practices under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive 12    Business Practices Act;13        (27) any felony requiring registration as a sex 14    offender under the Sex Offender Registration Act;15        (28) attempt of any the offenses set forth in 16    paragraphs (1) through (27) of this subsection (b); and17        (29) convictions set forth in Section 15-75 of this 18    Code.19    (c) The Department shall consider any mitigating factors 20contained in the record, when determining the appropriate 21disciplinary sanction, if any, to be imposed. In addition to 22those set forth in Section 2105-130 of the Department of 23Professional Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code 24of Illinois, mitigating factors shall include the following:25        (1) the bearing, if any, the criminal offense or 26    offenses for which the person was previously convicted   SB4024- 31 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    will have on his or her fitness or ability to perform one 2    or more such duties and responsibilities;3        (2) the time that has elapsed since the criminal 4    conviction; and5        (3) the age of the person at the time of the criminal 6    conviction.7    (d) The Department shall issue an annual report by January 831, 2018 and by January 31 each year thereafter, indicating 9the following:10        (1) the number of initial applicants for a license 11    under this Code within the preceding calendar year;12        (2) the number of initial applicants for a license 13    under this Code within the previous calendar year who had 14    a conviction;15        (3) the number of applicants with a conviction who 16    were granted a license under this Code within the previous 17    year;18        (4) the number of applicants denied a license under 19    this Code within the preceding calendar year; and20        (5) the number of applicants denied a license under 21    this Code solely on the basis of a conviction within the 22    preceding calendar year.23    (e) Nothing in this Section shall prevent the Department 24taking disciplinary or non-disciplinary action against a 25license as set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of 26Section 15-175 of this Code.   SB4024- 32 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1(Source: P.A. 99-876, eff. 1-1-17.) 2    (225 ILCS 41/15-75)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)4    Sec. 15-75. Grounds for discipline; penalties. 5    (a) (Blank).6    (a-5) Violations of this Code shall be punishable as 7follows:8        (1) Intentionally or knowingly making a false 9    statement on a Certificate of Death is a Class 4 felony.10        (2) Intentionally or knowingly making or filing false 11    records or reports in the practice of funeral directing 12    and embalming, including, but not limited to, false 13    records filed with State agencies or departments is a 14    Class 4 felony.15        (3) Intentionally or knowingly violating the chain of 16    custody record requirements set forth in Section 15-56 is 17    a Class 4 felony.18        (4) Intentionally or knowingly violating the 19    preparation rooms procedures and rules outlined in Section 20    15-55 is a Class 4 felony.21        (5) Engaging in funeral directing or embalming without 22    a license is a Class A misdemeanor.23        (6) Engaging in practice as a transfer care specialist 24    without a license is a Class A misdemeanor. 25    (b) The Department may refuse to issue or renew, revoke,   SB4024- 33 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1suspend, place on probation or administrative supervision, 2reprimand, or take other disciplinary or non-disciplinary 3action as the Department may deem appropriate, including fines 4not to exceed $10,000 for each violation, with regard to any 5license under this Code for any one or combination of the 6following:7        (1) Fraud or any misrepresentation in applying for or 8    procuring a license under this Code or in connection with 9    applying for renewal of a license under this Code.10        (2) For licenses, conviction by plea of guilty or nolo 11    contendere, finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of 12    judgment or by sentencing of any crime, including, but not 13    limited to, convictions, preceding sentences of 14    supervision, conditional discharge, or first offender 15    probation, under the laws of any jurisdiction of the 16    United States: (i) that is a felony or (ii) that is a 17    misdemeanor, an essential element of which is dishonesty, 18    or that is directly related to the practice of the 19    profession and, for initial applicants, convictions set 20    forth in Section 15-72 of this Code. 21        (3) (Blank).22        (4) Directly or indirectly paying or causing to be 23    paid any sum of money or other valuable consideration for 24    the securing of business or for obtaining authority to 25    dispose of any deceased human body.26        (5) Professional incompetence, gross negligence,   SB4024- 34 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    malpractice, or untrustworthiness in the practice of 2    funeral directing and embalming or funeral directing or in 3    practice as a transfer care specialist.4        (6) (Blank).5        (7) Engaging in, promoting, selling, or issuing burial 6    contracts, burial certificates, or burial insurance 7    policies in connection with the profession as a funeral 8    director and embalmer, funeral director, or funeral 9    director and embalmer intern in violation of any laws of 10    the State of Illinois.11        (8) Refusing, without cause, to surrender the custody 12    of a deceased human body upon the proper request of the 13    person or persons lawfully entitled to the custody of the 14    body.15        (9) Taking undue advantage of a client or clients as 16    to amount to the perpetration of fraud.17        (10) (Blank).18        (11) Encouraging, requesting, or suggesting by a 19    licensee or some person working on his behalf and with his 20    consent for compensation that a person utilize the 21    services of a certain funeral director and embalmer, 22    funeral director, or funeral establishment unless that 23    information has been expressly requested by the person. 24    This does not prohibit general advertising or pre-need 25    solicitation.26        (12) Making or causing to be made any false or   SB4024- 35 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    misleading statements about the laws concerning the 2    disposition of human remains, including, but not limited 3    to, the need to embalm, the need for a casket for cremation 4    or the need for an outer burial container.5        (13) (Blank).6        (14) Embalming or attempting to embalm a deceased 7    human body without express prior authorization of the 8    person responsible for making the funeral arrangements for 9    the body. This does not apply to cases where embalming is 10    directed by local authorities who have jurisdiction or 11    when embalming is required by State or local law. A 12    licensee may embalm without express prior authorization if 13    a good faith effort has been made to contact family 14    members and has been unsuccessful and the licensee has no 15    reason to believe the family opposes embalming. 16        (15) (Blank).17        (16) Soliciting human bodies after death or while 18    death is imminent.19        (17) Performing any act or practice that is a 20    violation of this Code, the rules for the administration 21    of this Code, or any federal, State or local laws, rules, 22    or regulations governing the practice of funeral directing 23    or embalming.24        (18) Performing any act or practice that is a 25    violation of Section 2 of the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive 26    Business Practices Act.  SB4024- 36 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1        (19) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 2    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 3    defraud or harm the public.4        (20) Taking possession of a dead human body without 5    having first obtained express permission from the person 6    holding the right to control the disposition in accordance 7    with Section 5 of the Disposition of Remains Act or a 8    public agency legally authorized to direct, control or 9    permit the removal of deceased human bodies.10        (21) Advertising in a false or misleading manner or 11    advertising using the name of an unlicensed person in 12    connection with any service being rendered in the practice 13    of funeral directing or funeral directing and embalming. 14    The use of any name of an unlicensed or unregistered 15    person in an advertisement so as to imply that the person 16    will perform services is considered misleading 17    advertising. Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent 18    including the name of any owner, officer or corporate 19    director of a funeral home, who is not a licensee, in any 20    advertisement used by a funeral home with which the 21    individual is affiliated, if the advertisement specifies 22    the individual's affiliation with the funeral home.23        (22) Charging for professional services not rendered, 24    including filing false statements for the collection of 25    fees for which services are not rendered.26        (23) Failing to account for or remit any monies,   SB4024- 37 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    documents, or personal property that belongs to others 2    that comes into a licensee's possession.3        (24) Treating any person differently to his detriment 4    because of race, color, creed, gender, religion, or 5    national origin.6        (25) Knowingly making any false statements, oral or 7    otherwise, of a character likely to influence, persuade or 8    induce others in the course of performing professional 9    services or activities.10        (26) (Blank).11        (27) Failing to acquire continuing education required 12    under this Code.13        (28) (Blank).14        (29) Aiding or assisting another person in violating 15    any provision of this Code or rules adopted pursuant to 16    this Code.17        (30) Failing within 10 days, to provide information in 18    response to a written request made by the Department.19        (31) Discipline by another state, District of 20    Columbia, territory, foreign nation, or governmental 21    agency, if at least one of the grounds for the discipline 22    is the same or substantially equivalent to those set forth 23    in this Section.24        (32) (Blank).25        (33) Mental illness or disability which results in the 26    inability to practice the profession with reasonable   SB4024- 38 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    judgment, skill, or safety.2        (34) Gross, willful, or continued overcharging for 3    professional services, including filing false statements 4    for collection of fees for which services are not 5    rendered.6        (35) Physical illness, including, but not limited to, 7    deterioration through the aging process or loss of motor 8    skill which results in a licensee's inability to practice 9    under this Code with reasonable judgment, skill, or 10    safety. 11        (36) Failing to comply with any of the following 12    required activities:13            (A) When reasonably possible, a funeral director 14        licensee or funeral director and embalmer licensee or 15        anyone acting on his or her behalf shall obtain the 16        express authorization of the person or persons 17        responsible for making the funeral arrangements for a 18        deceased human body prior to removing a body from the 19        place of death or any place it may be or embalming or 20        attempting to embalm a deceased human body, unless 21        required by State or local law. This requirement is 22        waived whenever removal or embalming is directed by 23        local authorities who have jurisdiction. If the 24        responsibility for the handling of the remains 25        lawfully falls under the jurisdiction of a public 26        agency, then the regulations of the public agency   SB4024- 39 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1        shall prevail.2            (B) A licensee shall clearly mark the price of any 3        casket offered for sale or the price of any service 4        using the casket on or in the casket if the casket is 5        displayed at the funeral establishment. If the casket 6        is displayed at any other location, regardless of 7        whether the licensee is in control of that location, 8        the casket shall be clearly marked and the registrant 9        shall use books, catalogues, brochures, or other 10        printed display aids to show the price of each casket 11        or service.12            (C) At the time funeral arrangements are made and 13        prior to rendering the funeral services, a licensee 14        shall furnish a written statement of services to be 15        retained by the person or persons making the funeral 16        arrangements, signed by both parties, that shall 17        contain: (i) the name, address and telephone number of 18        the funeral establishment and the date on which the 19        arrangements were made; (ii) the price of the service 20        selected and the services and merchandise included for 21        that price; (iii) a clear disclosure that the person 22        or persons making the arrangement may decline and 23        receive credit for any service or merchandise not 24        desired and not required by law or the funeral 25        director or the funeral director and embalmer; (iv) 26        the supplemental items of service and merchandise   SB4024- 40 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1        requested and the price of each item; (v) the terms or 2        method of payment agreed upon; and (vi) a statement as 3        to any monetary advances made by the registrant on 4        behalf of the family. The licensee shall maintain a 5        copy of the written statement of services in its 6        permanent records. All written statements of services 7        are subject to inspection by the Department. 8            (D) In all instances where the place of final 9        disposition of a deceased human body or the cremated 10        remains of a deceased human body is a cemetery, the 11        licensed funeral director and embalmer, or licensed 12        funeral director, who has been engaged to provide 13        funeral or embalming services shall remain at the 14        cemetery and personally witness the placement of the 15        human remains in their designated grave or the sealing 16        of the above ground depository, crypt, or urn. The 17        licensed funeral director or licensed funeral director 18        and embalmer may designate a licensed funeral director 19        and embalmer intern or representative of the funeral 20        home to be his or her witness to the placement of the 21        remains. If, at a time after the funeral home has 22        released the cremated remains, arrangements are made 23        for the placement of the cremated remains in a 24        designated grave, above-ground depository, crypt, or 25        urn, and the licensed funeral director or licensed 26        funeral director and embalmer was not contracted to be   SB4024- 41 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1        present for the burial or placement of the cremated 2        remains, the licensed funeral director or licensed 3        funeral director and embalmer is not required to be 4        present at the cemetery to witness the burial or 5        placement of the cremated remains. If the cemetery 6        authority, cemetery manager, or any other agent of the 7        cemetery takes any action that prevents compliance 8        with this paragraph (D), then the funeral director and 9        embalmer or funeral director shall provide written 10        notice to the Department within 5 business days after 11        failing to comply. If the Department receives this 12        notice, then the Department shall not take any 13        disciplinary action against the funeral director and 14        embalmer or funeral director for a violation of this 15        paragraph (D) unless the Department finds that the 16        cemetery authority, manager, or any other agent of the 17        cemetery did not prevent the funeral director and 18        embalmer or funeral director from complying with this 19        paragraph (D) as claimed in the written notice.20            (E) A funeral director or funeral director and 21        embalmer shall fully complete the portion of the 22        Certificate of Death under the responsibility of the 23        funeral director or funeral director and embalmer and 24        provide all required information. In the event that 25        any reported information subsequently changes or 26        proves incorrect, a funeral director or funeral   SB4024- 42 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1        director and embalmer shall immediately upon learning 2        the correct information correct the Certificate of 3        Death. 4        (37) A finding by the Department that the licensee, 5    after having his or her license placed on probationary 6    status or subjected to conditions or restrictions, 7    violated the terms of the probation or failed to comply 8    with such terms or conditions.9        (38) (Blank).10        (39) Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 11    report by the Department of Children and Family Services 12    pursuant to the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act 13    and, upon proof by clear and convincing evidence, being 14    found to have caused a child to be an abused child or 15    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 16    Child Reporting Act.17        (40) Habitual or excessive use or abuse of drugs 18    defined in law as controlled substances, alcohol, or any 19    other substance which results in the inability to practice 20    with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety.21        (41) Practicing under a false or, except as provided 22    by law, an assumed name.23        (42) Cheating on or attempting to subvert the 24    licensing examination administered under this Code.25    (c) The Department may refuse to issue or renew or may 26suspend without a hearing, as provided for in the Department   SB4024- 43 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1of Professional Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative 2Code of Illinois, the license of any person who fails to file a 3return, to pay the tax, penalty or interest shown in a filed 4return, or to pay any final assessment of tax, penalty or 5interest as required by any tax Act administered by the 6Illinois Department of Revenue, until the time as the 7requirements of the tax Act are satisfied in accordance with 8subsection (g) of Section 2105-15 of the Department of 9Professional Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code 10of Illinois.11    (d) No action may be taken under this Code against a person 12licensed under this Code unless the action is commenced within 135 years after the occurrence of the alleged violations. A 14continuing violation shall be deemed to have occurred on the 15date when the circumstances last existed that give rise to the 16alleged violation. 17    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed or enforced 18to give a funeral director and embalmer, or his or her 19designees, authority over the operation of a cemetery or over 20cemetery employees. Nothing in this Section shall be construed 21or enforced to impose duties or penalties on cemeteries with 22respect to the timing of the placement of human remains in 23their designated grave or the sealing of the above ground 24depository, crypt, or urn due to patron safety, the allocation 25of cemetery staffing, liability insurance, a collective 26bargaining agreement, or other such reasons.   SB4024- 44 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    (f) All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid 60 2days after the effective date of the order imposing the fine.3    (g) (Blank).4    (h) In cases where the Department of Healthcare and Family 5Services has previously determined a licensee or a potential 6licensee is more than 30 days delinquent in the payment of 7child support and has subsequently certified the delinquency 8to the Department, the Department may refuse to issue or renew 9or may revoke or suspend that person's license or may take 10other disciplinary action against that person based solely 11upon the certification of delinquency made by the Department 12of Healthcare and Family Services in accordance with item (5) 13of subsection (a) of Section 2105-15 of the Department of 14Professional Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code 15of Illinois. 16    (i) A person not licensed under this Code who is an owner 17of a funeral establishment or funeral business shall not aid, 18abet, assist, procure, advise, employ, or contract with any 19unlicensed person to offer funeral services or aid, abet, 20assist, or direct any licensed person contrary to or in 21violation of any rules or provisions of this Code. A person 22violating this subsection shall be treated as a licensee for 23the purposes of disciplinary action under this Section and 24shall be subject to cease and desist orders as provided in this 25Code, the imposition of a fine up to $10,000 for each violation 26and any other penalty provided by law.  SB4024- 45 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1    (j) The determination by a circuit court that a licensee 2is subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 3provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 4Code, as amended, operates as an automatic suspension. The 5suspension may end only upon a finding by a court that the 6licensee is no longer subject to the involuntary admission or 7judicial admission and issues an order so finding and 8discharging the licensee, and upon the recommendation of the 9Board to the Secretary that the licensee be allowed to resume 10his or her practice.11    (k) In enforcing this Code, the Department, upon a showing 12of a possible violation, may compel an individual licensed to 13practice under this Code, or who has applied for licensure 14under this Code, to submit to a mental or physical 15examination, or both, as required by and at the expense of the 16Department. The Department may order the examining physician 17to present testimony concerning the mental or physical 18examination of the licensee or applicant. No information shall 19be excluded by reason of any common law or statutory privilege 20relating to communications between the licensee or applicant 21and the examining physician. The examining physician shall be 22specifically designated by the Department. The individual to 23be examined may have, at his or her own expense, another 24physician of his or her choice present during all aspects of 25this examination. The examination shall be performed by a 26physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches.   SB4024- 46 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1Failure of an individual to submit to a mental or physical 2examination, when directed, shall result in an automatic 3suspension without hearing.4    A person holding a license under this Code or who has 5applied for a license under this Code who, because of a 6physical or mental illness or disability, including, but not 7limited to, deterioration through the aging process or loss of 8motor skill, is unable to practice the profession with 9reasonable judgment, skill, or safety, may be required by the 10Department to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by 11physicians approved or designated by the Department as a 12condition, term, or restriction for continued, reinstated, or 13renewed licensure to practice. Submission to care, counseling, 14or treatment as required by the Department shall not be 15considered discipline of a license. If the licensee refuses to 16enter into a care, counseling, or treatment agreement or fails 17to abide by the terms of the agreement, the Department may file 18a complaint to revoke, suspend, or otherwise discipline the 19license of the individual. The Secretary may order the license 20suspended immediately, pending a hearing by the Department. 21Fines shall not be assessed in disciplinary actions involving 22physical or mental illness or impairment.23    In instances in which the Secretary immediately suspends a 24person's license under this Section, a hearing on that 25person's license must be convened by the Department within 15 26days after the suspension and completed without appreciable   SB4024- 47 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1delay. The Department shall have the authority to review the 2subject individual's record of treatment and counseling 3regarding the impairment to the extent permitted by applicable 4federal statutes and regulations safeguarding the 5confidentiality of medical records.6    An individual licensed under this Code and affected under 7this Section shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate 8to the Department that he or she can resume practice in 9compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards under the 10provisions of his or her license. 11(Source: P.A. 102-881, eff. 1-1-23; 103-907, eff. 1-1-25.)  SB4024- 48 -LRB104 19608 AAS 33057 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    225 ILCS 41/1-104    225 ILCS 41/1-155    225 ILCS 41/1-206    225 ILCS 41/1-21 new7    225 ILCS 41/1-22 new8    225 ILCS 41/1-23 new9    225 ILCS 41/Art. 11 10    heading new11    225 ILCS 41/11-1 new12    225 ILCS 41/11-5 new13    225 ILCS 41/11-10 new14    225 ILCS 41/11-15 new15    225 ILCS 41/11-20 new16    225 ILCS 41/11-25 new17    225 ILCS 41/11-30 new18    225 ILCS 41/11-40 new19    225 ILCS 41/15-3020    225 ILCS 41/15-4521    225 ILCS 41/15-7222    225 ILCS 41/15-75